Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska61-213
Water division No. 1; boundaries.

Water division No. 1 shall consist of (1) all the lands of the state drained by the Platte Rivers and their tributaries lying west of the mouth of the Loup River and (2) all other lands lying south of the Platte and South Platte Rivers that may be watered from other superficial or subterranean streams not tributary to the Platte River.

Laws 1895, c. 69, § 2, p. 244;

R.S.1913, § 3379;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 1, § 11, p. 833;

C.S.1922, § 8416;

C.S.1929, § 46-511;

R.S.1943, § 46-216;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-216;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 13.